nl: Voertuighoes maatklasse: Compacte auto; Coupé; Crossover; Extra groot; Golfkar; Hatchback; Groot; Medium; Motorfiets; Pick-up (lange laadbak); Pick-up (korte laadbak); Pick-up (standaard laadbak); Camper/caravan; SUV; Sedan; Klein; Bestelbus; Stationwagen; Vaartuig; Overig
pt-BR: Capa para veículo classe de tamanho: Carro compacto; Cupê; Crossover; Extragrande; Carrinho de golfe; Hatchback; Grande; Médio; Motocicleta; Picape (caçamba longa); Picape (caçamba curta); Picape (caçamba padrão); Veículo recreativo (RV); SUV; Sedã; Pequeno; Van; Perua; Embarcação; Outro
it: Classe di dimensione della copertura del veicolo: Auto compatta; Coupé; Crossover; Extra large; Golf cart; Hatchback; Large; Medium; Moto; Pickup (cassone lungo); Pickup (cassone corto); Pickup (cassone standard); Camper (RV); SUV; Berlina; Small; Furgone; Station wagon; Imbarcazione; Altro
sk-SK: Trieda veľkosti plachty na vozidlo: Kompaktné auto; Kupé; Crossover; Extra veľké; Golfový vozík; Hatchback; Veľké; Stredné; Motocykel; Pickup (dlhá korba); Pickup (krátka korba); Pickup (štandardná korba); Karavan/obytné vozidlo (RV); SUV; Sedan; Malé; Dodávka; Kombi; Plavidlo; Iné
hr-HR: Navlaka za vozilo veličine klase: Kompaktni automobil; Kupe; Crossover; Vrlo veliko; Golf vozilo; Hatchback; Veliko; Srednje; Motocikl; Kamionet (dugi sanduk); Kamionet (kratki sanduk); Kamionet (standardni sanduk); Vozilo za kampiranje (RV); SUV; Limuzina; Malo; Kombi; Karavan; Plovilo; Ostalo
en: Vehicle cover size class: Compact car; Coupe; Crossover; Extra large; Golf cart; Hatchback; Large; Medium; Motorcycle; Pickup truck (long bed); Pickup truck (short bed); Pickup truck (standard bed); Recreational vehicle (RV); SUV; Sedan; Small; Van; Wagon; Watercraft; Other
bg-BG: Клас на размера на покривалото на превозното средство: Компактен автомобил; Купе; Кросоувър; Много голям; Голф количка; Хечбек; Голям; Среден; Мотоциклет; Пикап (с дълга каросерия); Пикап (с къса каросерия); Пикап (със стандартна каросерия); Кемпер/каравана (RV); SUV; Седан; Малък; Ван; Комби; Плавателен съд; Друго
es: Clase de tamaño de la funda para el vehículo: Auto compacto; Coupé; Crossover; Extra grande; Carrito de golf; Hatchback; Grande; Mediano; Motocicleta; Camioneta (caja larga); Camioneta (caja corta); Camioneta (caja estándar); Vehículo recreativo (RV); SUV; Sedán; Pequeño; Furgoneta; Station wagon; Embarcación; Otro
th: ขนาดของผ้าคลุมรถ: รถยนต์คอมแพ็กต์; คูเป้; ครอสโอเวอร์; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ; รถกอล์ฟ; แฮทช์แบ็ก; ขนาดใหญ่; ขนาดกลาง; รถมอเตอร์ไซค์; รถกระบะ (กระบะยาว); รถกระบะ (กระบะสั้น); รถกระบะ (กระบะมาตรฐาน); รถบ้าน (RV); SUV; ซีดาน; ขนาดเล็ก; รถตู้; วากอน; เรือ; อื่นๆ
cs: Třída velikosti plachty na vozidlo: Kompaktní vůz; Kupé; Crossover; Extra velké; Golfový vozík; Hatchback; Velké; Střední; Motocykl; Pickup (dlouhá korba); Pickup (krátká korba); Pickup (standardní korba); Obytný vůz (RV); SUV; Sedan; Malé; Dodávka; Kombi; Vodní plavidlo; Jiné
pl: Klasa rozmiaru pokrowca na pojazd: Samochód kompaktowy; Coupé; Crossover; Bardzo duży; Wózek golfowy; Hatchback; Duży; Średni; Motocykl; Pickup (długa paka); Pickup (krótka paka); Pickup (standardowa paka); Kamper (RV); SUV; Sedan; Mały; Van; Kombi; Pojazd wodny; Inne
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους καλύμματος οχήματος: Μικρομεσαίο αυτοκίνητο; Κουπέ (Coupe); Crossover; Πολύ μεγάλο; Αμαξίδιο γκολφ; Hatchback; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μοτοσικλέτα; Ημιφορτηγό (μεγάλη καρότσα); Ημιφορτηγό (μικρή καρότσα); Ημιφορτηγό (κανονική καρότσα); Αυτοκινούμενο τροχόσπιτο (RV); SUV; Σεντάν (Sedan); Μικρό; Βαν (Van); Station Wagon; Σκάφος; Άλλο
ko: 차량 커버 사이즈 등급: 소형차; 쿠페; 크로스오버; 특대형; 골프 카트; 해치백; 대형; 중형; 오토바이; 픽업 트럭(롱 베드); 픽업 트럭(숏 베드); 픽업 트럭(스탠다드 베드); 레크리에이션 차량(RV); SUV; 세단; 소형; 밴; 왜건; 선박; 기타
sv: Fordonsskyddets storleksklass: Kompaktbil; Coupé; Crossover; Extra stor; Golfbil; Halvkombi; Stor; Medium; Motorcykel; Pickup (långt flak); Pickup (kort flak); Pickup (standardflak); Husbil (RV); SUV; Sedan; Liten; Skåpbil; Kombi; Vattenfarkost; Övrigt
zh-CN: 车罩尺寸等级: 紧凑型轿车; 轿跑车; 跨界车; 特大号; 高尔夫球车; 掀背车; 大号; 中号; 摩托车; 皮卡车 (长货箱); 皮卡车 (短货箱); 皮卡车 (标准货箱); 房车 (RV); SUV; 轿车; 小号; 厢式货车; 旅行车; 水上交通工具; 其他
fr: Catégorie de taille de la housse de véhicule: Voiture compacte; Coupé; Multisegment; Très grand; Voiturette de golf; Voiture à hayon; Grand; Moyen; Moto; Camionnette (caisse longue); Camionnette (caisse courte); Camionnette (caisse standard); Véhicule récréatif (VR); VUS; Berline; Petit; Fourgonnette; Familiale; Motomarine; Autre
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės uždangalo dydžio klasė: Kompaktinis automobilis; Kupė; Krosoveris; Itin didelis; Golfo vežimėlis; Hečbekas; Didelis; Vidutinis; Motociklas; Pikapas (ilgas kėbulas); Pikapas (trumpas kėbulas); Pikapas (standartinis kėbulas); Kemperis (RV); Visureigis; Sedanas; Mažas; Furgonas; Universalas; Vandens transporto priemonė; Kita
vi: Hạng kích thước bạt phủ xe: Xe nhỏ (Compact); Xe coupe; Xe Crossover; Rất lớn; Xe golf; Xe hatchback; Lớn; Vừa; Xe máy; Xe bán tải (thùng dài); Xe bán tải (thùng ngắn); Xe bán tải (thùng tiêu chuẩn); Xe dã ngoại (RV); Xe SUV; Xe sedan; Nhỏ; Xe van; Xe wagon; Phương tiện thủy; Khác
hu: Járműtakaró-méretosztály: Kompakt autó; Kupé; Crossover; Extra nagy; Golfautó; Ferdehátú; Nagy; Közepes; Motorkerékpár; Pickup (hosszú plató); Pickup (rövid plató); Pickup (normál plató); Lakóautó (RV); SUV; Szedán; Kicsi; Furgon; Kombi; Vízi jármű; Egyéb
pt-PT: Classe de tamanho da cobertura para veículo: Carro compacto; Coupé; Crossover; Extragrande; Carrinho de golfe; Hatchback; Grande; Médio; Moto; Carrinha de caixa aberta (caixa longa); Carrinha de caixa aberta (caixa curta); Carrinha de caixa aberta (caixa padrão); Autocaravana (RV); SUV; Sedan; Pequeno; Carrinha; Carrinha; Embarcação; Outro
de: Größenklasse der Fahrzeugabdeckung: Kompaktwagen; Coupé; Crossover; Extra groß; Golfcart; Fließheck; Groß; Mittel; Motorrad; Pickup (lange Ladefläche); Pickup (kurze Ladefläche); Pickup (Standard-Ladefläche); Wohnmobil (RV); SUV; Limousine; Klein; Van; Kombi; Wasserfahrzeug; Sonstiges
fi: Ajoneuvon suojapeitteen kokoluokka: Pikkuauto; Coupé; Crossover; Erittäin suuri; Golfauto; Viistoperä; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Moottoripyörä; Avolava (pitkä lava); Avolava (lyhyt lava); Avolava (vakiolava); Matkailuauto (RV); Katumaasturi (SUV); Sedan; Pieni; Pakettiauto; Farmari; Vesikulkuneuvo; Muu
sl-SI: Razred velikosti ponjave za vozilo: Kompaktni avto; Kupe; Križanec; Zelo velik; Voziček za golf; Kombilimuzina; Velik; Srednji; Motorno kolo; Poltovornjak (dolg keson); Poltovornjak (kratek keson); Poltovornjak (standarden keson); Avtodom (RV); Terensko vozilo (SUV); Limuzina; Majhen; Kombi; Karavan; Plovilo; Drugo
da: Størrelsesklasse for køretøjscover: Kompaktbil; Coupé; Crossover; Ekstra stor; Golfvogn; Hatchback; Stor; Medium; Motorcykel; Pickup (langt lad); Pickup (kort lad); Pickup (standardlad); Autocamper (RV); SUV; Sedan; Lille; Varevogn; Stationcar; Fartøj; Andet
ja: 車両カバーサイズ区分: コンパクトカー; クーペ; クロスオーバー; 特大; ゴルフカート; ハッチバック; 大; 中; オートバイ; ピックアップトラック (ロングベッド); ピックアップトラック (ショートベッド); ピックアップトラック (スタンダードベッド); レクリエーショナルビークル (RV); SUV; セダン; 小; バン; ワゴン; 水上バイク; その他
tr: Araç kılıfı boyut sınıfı: Kompakt araç; Coupe; Crossover; Ekstra büyük; Golf arabası; Hatchback; Büyük; Orta; Motosiklet; Kamyonet (uzun kasa); Kamyonet (kısa kasa); Kamyonet (standart kasa); Karavan (RV); SUV; Sedan; Küçük; Van; Station wagon; Deniz aracı; Diğer
ro-RO: Clasa de dimensiune a prelatei auto: Mașină compactă; Coupe; Crossover; Foarte mare; Cărucior de golf; Hatchback; Mare; Mediu; Motocicletă; Autoutilitară tip pickup (platformă lungă); Autoutilitară tip pickup (platformă scurtă); Autoutilitară tip pickup (platformă standard); Vehicul de agrement (RV); SUV; Sedan; Mic; Furgonetă; Break; Ambarcațiune; Altele
zh-TW: 車罩尺寸等級: 小型車; 雙門轎跑車; 跨界休旅車; 特大; 高爾夫球車; 掀背車; 大; 中; 摩托車; 皮卡車 (長車斗); 皮卡車 (短車斗); 皮卡車 (標準車斗); 露營車 (RV); 運動休旅車 (SUV); 轎車; 小; 廂型車; 旅行車; 船隻; 其他
nb: Størrelsesklasse for kjøretøysdekke: Kompaktbil; Kupé; Crossover; Ekstra stor; Golfbil; Kombikupé; Stor; Medium; Motorsykkel; Pickup (langt lasteplan); Pickup (kort lasteplan); Pickup (standard lasteplan); Bobil; SUV; Sedan; Liten; Varebil; Stasjonsvogn; Vannscooter; Annet
ru: Класс размера автомобильного чехла: Компактный автомобиль; Купе; Кроссовер; Очень большой; Гольф-кар; Хэтчбек; Большой; Средний; Мотоцикл; Пикап (длинный кузов); Пикап (короткий кузов); Пикап (стандартный кузов); Дом на колесах (RV); Внедорожник (SUV); Седан; Маленький; Фургон; Универсал; Водный транспорт; Другое